Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Chapter 36. Southern Dairy Compact
§ 69-36-5.
[Effective when enacted into law by at least two other states within compact group and when consent of Congress obtained] Access to records and information.

The Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce may, by lawful means, obtain information pertaining to the dairy industry which he deems necessary to carry out the purposes of the provisions of this chapter and the Southern Dairy Compact. Such information may be utilized by the commissioner, the delegates, and the Southern Dairy Compact Commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 421, § 3, eff when enacted into law by at least two (2) other states within the compact group of states and when the consent of Congress has been obtained.

§ 69-36-7.
[Effective when enacted into law by at least two other states within compact group and when consent of Congress obtained] Rules and regulations.

The Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce may adopt such rules and regulations, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedure Act, Section 25-43-1 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972, as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter and the Southern Dairy Compact.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 421, § 4, eff when enacted into law by at least two (2) other states within the compact group of states and when the consent of Congress has been obtained.

§ 69-36-9.
[Effective when enacted into law by at least two other states within compact group and when consent of Congress obtained] Penalties for violations.

No person shall violate this chapter, the Southern Dairy Compact, or any rules or regulations adopted pursuant to either this chapter or the compact.

In addition to any other penalties provided by law, a civil penalty of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) may be imposed for each violation, licenses may be revoked or suspended, or an additional penalty may be imposed in lieu of revocation or suspension.

Each day on which a violation occurs shall be a separate violation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 421, § 5, eff when enacted into law by at least two (2) other states within the compact group of states and when the consent of Congress has been obtained.